Vermont, session 2025-2026, H820.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Environmental Appeals * * *
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. chapter 220 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 220. CONSOLIDATED ENVIRONMENTAL APPEALS
§ 8501. PURPOSE
It is the purpose of this chapter to:
* * *
VT LEG #386247 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.820
2026 Page 2 of 51
(3) encourage people to get involved in the Act 250 permitting process
at the initial stages of review by a District Commission by requiring
participation as a prerequisite for an appeal of a District Commission decision
to the Environmental Division Land Use Review Board;
* * *
§ 8502. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(3) “Environmental Court” or “Environmental Division” means the
Environmental Division of the Superior Court established by 4 V.S.A. § 30.
[Repealed.]
* * *
(7) “Person aggrieved” means a person who alleges an injury to a
particularized interest protected by the provisions of law listed in section 8503
of this title, attributable to an act or decision by a district coordinator, District
Commission, the Secretary, or the Environmental Division stemming from a
decision that can be redressed by the Environmental Division or the Supreme
Court Board or Secretary. For purposes of appeals pursuant to 24 V.S.A.
chapter 117, the injury alleged shall be to a particularized interest protected by
24 V.S.A. § 4302(c).
* * *
VT LEG #386247 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.820
2026 Page 3 of 51
(9) “Record” means a good faith compilation of all the materials and
testimony presented to, or considered by, a District Commission or appropriate
municipal panel that has been appealed to the Board, including the application,
recordings of testimony, transcripts, reports, exhibits, plans, schematics,
drawings, and any other such information as well as any written materials
including memoranda, written communications, responses, reports, and
decisions issued by the District Commission or appropriate municipal panel.
(10) “Administrative record” means all materials the Agency of Natural
Resources relied on or considered or that formed the foundation for its final
action and not otherwise exempt from disclosure under the Vermont Public
Records Act including the following:
(A) all application materials;
(B) all staff reports and related documents prepared by the Agency
with respect to compliance with substantive and procedural requirements of the
relevant statutory and regulatory requirements with respect to the action being
appealed, including public notices, inspection reports, correspondence,
memoranda, environmental reviews, scientific studies, and compilations of
data relied upon by the Agency staff in making recommendations or decisions
as well as any decision documents;
(C) all written comments, including maps, drawings, schematics, and
any exhibits and attachments, provided to the Agency by any person or entity
VT LEG #386247 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.820
2026 Page 4 of 51
including other federal and State agencies, local governments, regional
planning commissions, the applicant, or an entity subject to enforcement
relating to the action being appealed; and
(D) all transcripts of proceedings with information considered by the
Agency in reaching its decision in the action being appealed.
§ 8503. APPLICABILITY
* * *
(d) This chapter shall govern all appeals from an act or decision of the
Environmental Division Land Use Review Board or Secretary under this
chapter.
* * *
§ 8504. APPEALS TO THE ENVIRONMENTAL DIVISION BOARD OR
SECRETARY
(a) Act 250 and Agency appeals. Within 30 days of following the date of
the act or decision, any person aggrieved by an act or decision of the Secretary,
a District Commission, or a district coordinator under the provisions of law
listed in section 8503 of this title, or any party by right, may appeal to the
Environmental Division, except for an act or decision of the Secretary under
subdivision 6086b(3)(E) of this title or governed by section 8506 of this title
Board.
VT LEG #386247 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.820
2026 Page 5 of 51
(b) Agency appeals. Within 30 days following the date of the act or
decision, any person aggrieved by an act or decision of the Secretary under the
provisions of law listed in section 8503 of this title, or any party by right, may
appeal to the Secretary, except for an act or decision of the Secretary under
subdivision 6086b(3)(E) of this title or governed by section 8506 of this title.
At the request of the Secretary, the Board shall assign agency appeals to a
hearing officer who shall conduct the hearing on behalf of, or alongside, the
Secretary.
(b)(c) Planning and zoning chapter appeals.
(1) Within 30 days of following the date of the act or decision, an
interested person, as defined in 24 V.S.A. § 4465, or a person aggrieved
owning or occupying property in the immediate neighborhood of a property
that is the subject of the decision or act, who has participated as defined in 24
V.S.A. § 4471 in the municipal regulatory proceeding under that chapter may
appeal to the Environmental Division Board an act or decision made under that
chapter by a board of adjustment, a planning commission, or a development
review board; provided, however, that decisions of a development review
board under 24 V.S.A. § 4420 with respect to local Act 250 review of
municipal impacts are not subject to appeal but shall serve as presumptions
under chapter 151 of this title.
VT LEG #386247 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.820
2026 Page 6 of 51
(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (1) of this subsection, an interested
person may appeal an act or decision under 24 V.S.A. chapter 117 if the
Environmental judge Board determines that:
(A) there was a procedural defect that prevented the person from
obtaining interested person status or participating in the proceeding;
(B) the decision being appealed is the grant or denial of interested
person status; or
(C) some other condition exists that would result in manifest injustice
if the person’s right to appeal was disallowed.
(c)(d) Notice of the filing of an appeal.
(1) Upon filing an appeal from an act or decision of the District
Commission, the appellant shall notify all parties who had party status as of the
end of the District Commission proceeding, and all friends of the Commission,
and the Land Use Review Board that an appeal is being filed. In addition, the
appellant shall publish notice not more than 10 days after providing notice as
required under this subsection, at the appellant’s expense, in a newspaper of
general circulation in the area of the project that is the subject of the decision.
* * *
(d)(e) Requirement to participate before the District Commission or the
Secretary.
VT LEG #386247 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.820
2026 Page 7 of 51
(1) Participation before District Commission. An aggrieved person shall
not appeal an act or decision that was made by a District Commission unless
the person was granted party status by the District Commission pursuant to
subdivision 6085(c)(1)(E) of this title, participated in the proceedings before
the District Commission, and retained party status at the end of the District
Commission proceedings. In addition, the person may only appeal those issues
under the criteria with respect to which the person was granted party status.
However, notwithstanding these limitations, an aggrieved person may appeal
an act or decision of the District Commission if the Environmental judge
Board determines that:
* * *
(2) Participation before the Secretary.
(A) An aggrieved person shall not appeal an act or decision of the
Secretary unless the person submitted to the Secretary a written comment
during the comment period or an oral comment at the public meeting
conducted by the Secretary, identifying the general concerns with the proposed
act or decision of the Secretary. In addition, the person may only appeal issues
related to the person’s comment to the Secretary.
(i) To be sufficient for the purpose of appeal, a comment to the
Secretary shall identify each reasonably ascertainable issue with enough
particularity so that a meaningful response can be provided.
VT LEG #386247 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.820
2026 Page 8 of 51
(ii) The appellant shall identify each comment that the appellant
submitted to the Secretary that identifies or relates to an issue raised in his or
her appeal.
(iii) A person moving to dismiss an appeal or an issue raised by an
appeal pursuant to this subdivision (A) shall have the burden to prove that the
requirements of this subdivision (A) are not satisfied.
(B) Notwithstanding the limitations of subdivision (2)(A) of this
subsection, an aggrieved person may appeal an act or decision of the Secretary
if the Environmental judge Secretary determines that:
(i) there was a procedural defect that prevented the person from
commenting during the comment period or at the public meeting or otherwise
participating in the proceeding;
(ii) the Secretary did not conduct a comment period and did not
hold a public meeting; or
(iii) the person demonstrates that an issue was not reasonably
ascertainable during the review of an application or other request that led to the
Secretary’s act or decision; or
(iv) some other condition exists that would result in manifest
injustice if the person’s right to appeal was disallowed.
(e)(f) Act 250 jurisdictional determinations by a district coordinator.
* * *
VT LEG #386247 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.820
2026 Page 9 of 51
(f)(g) Stays.
(1) The filing of an appeal shall automatically stay the act or decision in
the following situations:
(A) acts or decisions involving stream alteration permits or shoreline
encroachment permits issued by the Secretary; or
(B) the denial of interested person status by a board of adjustment,
planning commission, or development review board.
(2) Upon petition by a party or upon its own motion for a stay of an act
or decision, the Environmental Division Board shall perform the initial review
of the request and may grant a stay. Any decision under this subsection to
issue a stay shall be subject to appeal to the Supreme Court according to the
Rules of Appellate Procedure.
(g)(h) Consolidated appeals. The Environmental Division Board may
consolidate or coordinate different appeals, in accordance with section 6035 of
this title, where those appeals all relate to the same project, including appeals
of permits from the Secretary, with the Secretary’s agreement.
(h) De novo hearing. The Environmental Division, applying the
substantive standards that were applicable before the tribunal appealed from,
shall hold a de novo hearing on those issues that have been appealed, except in
the case of:
VT LEG #386247 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.820
2026 Page 10 of 51
(1) a decision being appealed on the record pursuant to 24 V.S.A.
chapter 117;
(2) a decision of the Commissioner of Forests, Parks and Recreation
under section 2625 of this title being appealed on the record, in which case the
court shall affirm the decision, unless it finds that the Commissioner did not
have reasonable grounds on which to base the decision.
(i) Deference to Agency technical determinations. In the adjudication of
appeals relating to land use permits under chapter 151 of this title, technical
determinations of the Secretary shall be accorded the same deference as they
are accorded by a District Commission under subsection 6086(d) of this title.
* * *
(k) Limitations on appeals. Notwithstanding any other provision of this
section:
(1) there shall be no appeal from a District Commission decision when
the Commission has issued a permit and no hearing was requested or held, or
no motion to alter was filed following the issuance of an administrative
amendment;
(2) a municipal decision regarding whether a particular application
qualifies for a recorded hearing under 24 V.S.A. § 4471(b) shall not be subject
to appeal;
VT LEG #386247 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.820
2026 Page 11 of 51
(3) if a District Commission issues a partial decision under subsection
6086(b) of this title, any appeal of that decision must be taken within 30 days
following the date of that decision; and
(4) it shall be the goal of the Environmental Division Board to issue a
decision on a case regarding an appeal of an appropriate municipal panel
decision under 24 V.S.A. chapter 117 within 90 days following the close of the
hearing.
(l) Representation. The Secretary may represent the Agency of Natural
Resources in all appeals under this section. The Chair of the Land Use Review
Board may represent the Board in any appeal under this section, unless the
Board directs otherwise. If more than one State agency, other than the Board,
either appeals or seeks to intervene in an appeal under this section, only the
Attorney General may represent the interests of those agencies of the State in
the appeal.
(m) Precedent. Prior decisions of the Environmental Division of the
Superior Court, Environmental Board, Water Resources Board, and Waste
Facilities Panel shall be given the same weight and consideration as prior
decisions of the Environmental Division Land Use Review Board.
(n) Intervention. Any person may intervene in a pending appeal if that
person:
VT LEG #386247 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.820
2026 Page 12 of 51
(1) appeared as a party in the action appealed from and retained party
status;
(2) is a party by right;
(3) is the Land Use Review Board; [Repealed.]
(4) is a person aggrieved, as defined in this chapter;
(5) qualifies as an “interested person,” as established in 24 V.S.A.
§ 4465, with respect to appeals under 24 V.S.A. chapter 117; or
(6) meets the standard for intervention established in the Vermont Rules
of Civil Procedure.
(o) With respect to review of an act or decision of the Secretary pursuant to
3 V.S.A. § 2809, the Division Board may reverse the act or decision or amend
an allocation of costs to an applicant only if the Division Board determines that
the act, decision, or allocation was arbitrary, capricious, or an abuse of
discretion. In the absence of such a determination, the Division Board shall
require the applicant to pay the Secretary all costs assessed pursuant to
3 V.S.A. § 2809.
(p) Administrative record. The Secretary shall certify the administrative
record as defined in chapter 170 of this title and shall transfer a certified copy
of that record to the Environmental Division Board when:
(1) there is an appeal of an act or decision of the Secretary that is based
on that record; or
VT LEG #386247 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.820
2026 Page 13 of 51
(2) there is an appeal of a decision of a District Commission, and the
applicant used a decision of the Secretary based on that record to create a
presumption under a criterion of subsection 6086(a) of this title that is at issue
in the appeal.
(q) Amicus curiae. Notwithstanding the hearing of an appeal as de novo,
any judge the Board presiding over appeals from chapter 151 of this title and
Agency permits pursuant to subsection (a) (b) of this section may allow
participation in such appeals by amicus curiae following the Rules of Appellate
Procedure Rule 29.
§ 8505. APPEALS TO THE SUPREME COURT
(a) Any person aggrieved by a decision of the Environmental Division
Board or Secretary pursuant to this subchapter, or any party by right, or the
Board may, in accordance with 3 V.S.A. § 815, appeal to the Supreme Court
within 30 days of following the date of the entry of the order or judgment
appealed from, provided that:
(1) the person was a party to the proceeding before the Environmental
Division Board or Secretary; or
(2) the decision being appealed is the denial of party status; or
(3) the Supreme Court determines that:
(A) there was a procedural defect that prevented the person from
participating in the proceeding; or
VT LEG #386247 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.820
2026 Page 14 of 51
(B) some other condition exists that would result in manifest injustice
if the person’s right to appeal were disallowed.
(b) An objection that has not been raised before the Environmental
Division Board or Secretary may not be considered by the Supreme Court,
unless the failure or neglect to raise that objection is excused by the Supreme
Court because of extraordinary circumstances.
(c) Only the Attorney General may represent the State in all appeals under
this section.
* * *
§ 8507. CONDUCT OF APPEALS TO THE BOARD OR THE
SECRETARY
(a) The Land Use Review Board’s and the Secretary’s process of review
will depend on whether the matter is simple or complex. The Board or hearing
officer, if assigned to a matter, shall make a determination of whether the
matter before the Board is simple or complex.
(1) Factors that may be considered to determine whether an appeal is
simple or complex include:
(A) the scale of the issues presented on appeal;
(B) the involvement of multiple agencies or other regulatory bodies;
(C) the number of parties, interested persons, and other participants;
(D) factual, technical, or scientific complexity;
VT LEG #386247 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.820
2026 Page 15 of 51
(E) legal complexity; or
(F) other factors relevant under the circumstances.
(2) If the parties agree to simple review, the Board shall adjudicate the
matter under simple review.
(b) For complex matters, the full Board or the Secretary shall adjudicate the
appeal and at its discretion may assign to a hearing officer some or all of the
adjudication process. Parties to a complex appeal may initiate motion practice,
which shall be limited to dispositive motions only. The assigned hearing
officer shall hold an evidentiary hearing and subsequently issue a
recommendation and draft order; alternatively, the Board or Secretary may sit
in directly on the initial hearing alongside the hearing officer, at its discretion.
Subsequently, the full Board or Secretary shall have the discretion to either
hear the appeal directly in a formal, noticed hearing, or to rule on the
recommendation of the hearing officer.
(1) The Board and Secretary shall have the authority to accept testimony
in the form of prefiled written testimony, and written rebuttal testimony. At
the request of the parties, the Board and Secretary may accept live testimony or
cross-examination based upon a showing that it will not delay the hearing, is
more efficient, or would not unfairly disadvantage any party.
VT LEG #386247 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.820
2026 Page 16 of 51
(2) Parties in complex appeals may be provided the limited opportunity
to supplement the record, including through filed or live testimony subject to
an opportunity for cross-examination.
(c) Notwithstanding 3 V.S.A. chapter 25, for simple matters, the
adjudication of the appeal can be decided by the Board or Secretary on a
consent agenda. Proceedings on simple matters shall not involve discovery or
motion practice. The recommendation and draft order of the hearing officer
shall be considered by the Board, which shall rule on the recommendation of
the hearing officer.
(d) In all proceedings, discovery shall be limited to that which is necessary
to supplement the record, pursuant to this subchapter.
(e) The Board or Secretary shall have the authority to limit the motion
practice to the needs of the case, in the interest of promoting efficient and
expedient resolution of the matter.
Sec. 2. 3 V.S.A. § 2825 is amended to read:
§ 2825. DUTIES OF THE SECRETARY
* * *
(f) The Secretary shall have authority to decide appeals of permit decisions
made by the Secretary pursuant to the requirements and procedures established
in 10 V.S.A. chapters 220 and 151.
VT LEG #386247 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.820
2026 Page 17 of 51
* * * Land Use Review Board * * *
Sec. 3. 10 V.S.A. § 6021 is amended to read:
§ 6021. BOARD; VACANCY; REMOVAL
(a) Board established. The Land Use Review Board is created.
(1) The Board shall consist of five three members appointed by the
Governor after review and approval by the Land Use Review Board
Nominating Committee in accordance with subdivision (2) of this subsection
and confirmed with the advice and consent of the Senate, so that one
appointment expires in each year. The Chair and the other four two members
shall be full-time positions. In making these appointments, the Governor and
the Senate shall give consideration to candidates who have experience,
expertise, or skills relating to one or more of the following areas:
environmental science; land use law, policy, planning, and development; and
community planning. All candidates shall have a commitment to
environmental justice.
(A) The Governor shall appoint a chair of the Board, a position that
shall be a full-time position. The Governor shall ensure Board membership
reflects, to the extent possible, the racial, ethnic, gender, and geographic
diversity of the State. The Board shall not contain two members who reside in
the same county.
VT LEG #386247 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.820
2026 Page 18 of 51
(B) Following initial appointments, the members shall be appointed
for terms of five six years. All terms shall begin on July 1 and expire on June
30. A member may continue serving until a successor is appointed. The initial
appointments shall be for staggered terms of one year, two years, three years,
four years, and five six years.
(2)(A) The Land Use Review Board Nominating Committee shall
advertise the position when a vacancy will occur on the Land Use Review
Board.
* * *
(C) The Governor shall appoint, with the advice and consent of the
Senate, a chair and four two members of the Board from the list of well-
qualified candidates sent to the Governor by the Committee.
(D) Not more than two members of the Board shall belong to the
same political party.
(b) Terms; vacancy; succession. The term of each appointment subsequent
to the initial appointments described in subsection (a) of this section shall be
five six years. Any appointment to fill a vacancy shall be for the unexpired
portion of the term vacated. A member may seek reappointment by informing
the Governor. If the Governor decides not to reappoint the member, the
Nominating Committee shall advertise the vacancy.
VT LEG #386247 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.820
2026 Page 19 of 51
(c) Removal. Notwithstanding the provisions of 3 V.S.A. § 2004, members
shall only be removable for cause by the remaining members of the Board
Governor. The Board shall adopt rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 to
define the basis and process for removal.
* * *
Sec. 4. LAND USE REVIEW BOARD MEMBER APPOINTMENTS
The Governor shall appoint the members of the Land Use Review Board on
or before January 1, 2027, and the terms of any Land Use Review Board
members not appointed consistent with the requirements of 10 V.S.A.
§ 6021(a)(1)(A) or (B) shall expire on that day. Current members of the Board
may apply to remain a member of the Board.
Sec. 5. 10 V.S.A. § 6027a is added to read:
§ 6027a. HEARINGS AND HEARING OFFICERS
(a) When a matter comes before the Board, the Board shall have the
authority to appoint a hearing officer for that matter at its discretion. Board
members may sit as hearing officers in a matter.
(b) Hearing officers shall have the authority to hold any hearing in any
matter within the Board’s jurisdiction. Hearings shall be conducted in an
impartial manner and as contested cases.
(c) At the request of the Secretary, a hearing officer, applying the
provisions of this chapter, shall conduct hearings of Agency of Natural
VT LEG #386247 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.820
2026 Page 20 of 51
Resources decisions on behalf of the Secretary and may, at the Secretary’s
request, coordinate the appeal with related appeals of a decision by a District
Commission or by an appropriate municipal panel.
(d) The hearing officer shall set a date, time, and place for a scheduling
conference within 30 days following when the Board receives the record.
Written notice of the time and place for the hearing shall be served on the
parties. Service of the notice of hearing shall be made at least 14 calendar days
prior to the date of the conference.
(e) The hearing officer shall, within the hearing officer’s discretion, seek to
ensure that a hearing provides a forum for nonlawyers to present their case
adequately and without prejudice.
(f) The hearing officer shall have the authority and discretion to:
(1) Administer oaths in all cases, provided this power is properly
incidental to the performance of the officer’s duty or that of the Board.
(2) Sign and issue subpoenas in the name of the Board, at the request of
any party, requiring attendance and giving of testimony by witnesses and the
production of books, papers, documents, and other evidence, and said
subpoenas shall be regulated by the civil practice law and rules. Nothing
herein contained shall affect the authority of an attorney for a party to issue
such subpoenas under the provisions of the civil practice law and rules.
VT LEG #386247 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.820
2026 Page 21 of 51
(3) Regulate the course of the hearings, set the time and place for
continued hearings, and fix the time for filing of briefs and other documents.
(4) Direct the parties to appear and confer to consider the simplification
of the issues by consent of the parties.
(5) Issue proposals for decision to be presented to the Board or
Secretary in accordance with 3 V.S.A. § 811.
(6) Ensure a complete administrative record is consolidated and
presented before the Board or Secretary, also ensuring that such record is
suitable for appeal to the Supreme Court.
(g) The Board may assign a hearing officer to conduct or assist in
mediation. A hearing officer who participates in mediation shall be
disqualified from any further role in that matter.
Sec. 6. 10 V.S.A. § 6035 is added to read:
§ 6035. JURISDICTION OF THE LAND USE REVIEW BOARD
(a)(1) Beginning on July 1, 2027, the Land Use Review Board shall assume
jurisdiction over appeals from acts or decisions under this chapter from the
Environmental Division of the Superior Court.
(2) Beginning on July 1, 2028, the Land Use Review Board shall
assume jurisdiction over municipal zoning permit appeals under 24 V.S.A.
§§ 4465 and 4471 from the Environmental Division of the Superior Court.
VT LEG #386247 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.820
2026 Page 22 of 51
(3) Beginning on July 1, 2028, the Secretary shall assume jurisdiction
over appeals from permit, license, certification, and enforcement actions by the
Agency of Natural Resources from the Environmental Division of the Superior
Court.
(b) Applicants for permits under this chapter or Agency of Natural
Resources permits that are also undergoing municipal zoning permit appeals
under 24 V.S.A. § 4465 or 4471 for the same project shall have the option to
have their appeals consolidated or coordinated at the Board. At the Board’s
discretion, the Board may approve or deny the proposed consolidation or
coordination of municipal and Act 250 appeals for the same project, dependent
on whether:
(1) the consolidation or coordination of the appeals would expedite the
processing and resolution of the matters;
(2) the two matters to be consolidated or coordinated deal with
substantially similar factual and legal issues;
(3) the consolidation or coordination would not adversely affect the
interests of the parties; and
(4) the two matters to be consolidated or coordinated are not at
significantly different procedural postures.
Sec. 7. 10 V.S.A. § 6036 is added to read:
§ 6036. SCOPE AND STANDARD OF REVIEW
VT LEG #386247 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.820
2026 Page 23 of 51
(a) When reviewing matters appealed from District Commissions,
appropriate municipal panels, or the Agency, the Board or Secretary shall
consider only the record before it, except where supplementation of the record
is permitted pursuant to this subchapter.
(b) The Board or Secretary shall review legal conclusions and mixed
questions of law and fact reached by a District Commission, appropriate
municipal panel, or the Agency de novo. The Board may reverse or modify
the factual findings of the decision on appeal only when they are not supported
by substantial evidence in the record.
(c) The Board shall review jurisdictional opinions issued by district
coordinators de novo.
Sec. 8. 10 V.S.A. § 6037 is added to read:
§ 6037. SUPPLEMENTATION OF THE RECORD
(a) If, before the date set for a hearing, application is made to the Board or
Secretary for leave to present additional evidence, and it is shown to the
satisfaction of the Board or Secretary that the additional evidence is material
and that there was just cause for failure to present it in the proceeding before
the District Commission, Agency, or appropriate municipal panel, the Board or
Secretary may order that the additional evidence be taken. The Board or
Secretary may modify their findings and decisions by reason of the additional
evidence and shall file that evidence and any modifications, new findings, or
VT LEG #386247 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.820
2026 Page 24 of 51
decisions with the Board. The Board or Secretary is authorized to exclude
irrelevant, immaterial, or unduly repetitious evidence.
(b) Cause for the supplementation of the record may include:
(1) the introduction of expert testimony where needed to interpret
complex issues or matters before the court;
(2) information outside the record that would cause substantial prejudice
or injustice to a party if excluded; or
(3) a showing of prejudice or bias, bad faith, or illegal behavior in a
lower proceeding, if the proponent of the evidence demonstrates just cause for
its inclusion.
Sec. 9. 10 V.S.A. § 6025 is amended to read:
§ 6025. RULES
(a) The Board may adopt rules of procedure for itself and the District
Commissions. The Board’s procedure for approving regional plans and
regional plan maps, which may be adopted as rules or issued as guidance, shall
ensure that the maps are consistent with legislative intent as expressed in
section 2802 of this title and 24 V.S.A. §§ 4302 and 4348a.
* * *
(d) On or before January 1, 2027, the Board and the Secretary shall adopt
rules of procedure that govern appeals and other contested cases before it that
are consistent with this chapter. The rules may include the Board’s use of
VT LEG #386247 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.820
2026 Page 25 of 51
hearing officers. The Board and Secretary shall coordinate the development of
these procedures.
Sec. 10. 10 V.S.A. § 6027(h) is amended to read:
(h) The Board may shall hear:
(1) all appeals from an act or decision of a District Commission under
this chapter, including fee refund requests under section 6083a of this title;
(2) appeals from an act or decision of a district coordinator under
subsection 6007(d) of this chapter; and
(3) appeals from an act or decision by an appropriate municipal panel or
zoning administrator under 24 V.S.A. chapter 117.
Sec. 11. 10 V.S.A. § 6086(f) is amended to read:
(f) Prior to any appeal of a permit issued by a District Commission, any
aggrieved party may file a request for a stay of construction with the District
Commission together with a declaration of intent to appeal the permit. The
stay request shall be automatically granted for 14 days upon receipt and notice
to all parties and pending a ruling on the merits of the stay request pursuant to
Board rules. The automatic stay shall not extend beyond the 30-day appeal
period unless a valid appeal has been filed with the Environmental Division
Board. The automatic stay may be granted only once under this subsection
during the 30-day appeal period. Following appeal of the District Commission
decision, any stay request must be filed with the Environmental Division
VT LEG #386247 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.820
2026 Page 26 of 51
pursuant to the provisions of chapter 220 of this title Board. A District
Commission shall not stay construction authorized by a permit processed under
the Board’s minor application procedures.
Sec. 12. 10 V.S.A. § 6083a is amended to read:
§ 6083a. ACT 250 FEES
* * *
(k) All persons filing an appeal, cross appeal, or petition from a District
Commission decision or jurisdictional opinion shall pay a fee of $295.00, plus
publication costs, unless the Board approves a waiver of fees based on
indigency.
Sec. 13. 10 V.S.A. § 6029 is amended to read:
§ 6029. ACT 250 PERMIT FUND
There is hereby established a special fund to be known as the Act 250
Permit Fund for the purposes of implementing the provisions of this chapter
and chapter 220 of this title. Revenues to the fund shall be those fees collected
in accordance with section 6083a of this title, gifts, appropriations, and
copying and distribution fees. Revenues to the fund shall also include those
fees and costs collected under chapter 220 of this title. The Board shall be
responsible for the Fund and shall account for revenues and expenditures of the
Board. At the Commissioner’s discretion, the Commissioner of Finance and
Management may anticipate amounts to be collected and may issue warrants
VT LEG #386247 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.820
2026 Page 27 of 51
based thereon for the purposes of this section. Disbursements from the Fund
shall be made through the annual appropriations process to the Board and to
the Agency of Natural Resources to support those programs within the Agency
that directly or indirectly assist in the review of Act 250 applications. This
Fund shall be administered as provided in 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5.
* * * Municipal Zoning * * *
Sec. 14. 24 V.S.A. § 4465 is amended to read:
§ 4465. APPEALS OF DECISIONS OF THE ADMINISTRATIVE OFFICER
(a) An interested person may appeal any decision or act taken by the
administrative officer in any municipality by filing a notice of appeal with the
secretary of the board of adjustment or development review board of that
municipality or with the clerk of that municipality if no such secretary has been
elected. This notice of appeal must be filed within 15 days following the date
of that decision or act, and a copy of the notice of appeal shall be filed with the
administrative officer.
(b) As used in this chapter, an “interested person” means any one of the
following:
* * *
(4) Any 20 persons who may be any combination of voters, residents, or
real property owners within a municipality listed in subdivision (2) of this
subsection who, by signed petition to the appropriate municipal panel of a
VT LEG #386247 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.820
2026 Page 28 of 51
municipality, the plan or a bylaw of which is at issue in any appeal brought
under this title, allege that any relief requested by a person under this title, if
granted, will not be in accord with the policies, purposes, or terms of the plan
or bylaw of that municipality. This petition to the appropriate municipal panel
must designate one person to serve as the representative of the petitioners
regarding all matters related to the appeal. For purposes of this subdivision, an
appeal shall not include the character of the area affected if the project has a
residential component that includes affordable housing.
(5) Any department and administrative subdivision of this State owning
property or any interest in property within a municipality listed in subdivision
(2) of this subsection, and the Agency of Commerce and Community
Development of this State.
* * *
Sec. 15. 24 V.S.A. § 4471 is amended to read:
§ 4471. APPEAL TO ENVIRONMENTAL DIVISION LAND USE
REVIEW BOARD
(a) Participation required. An interested person who has participated in a
municipal regulatory proceeding authorized under this title may appeal a
decision rendered in that proceeding by an appropriate municipal panel to the
Environmental Division Land Use Review Board. Participation in a local
regulatory proceeding shall consist of offering, through oral or written
VT LEG #386247 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.820
2026 Page 29 of 51
testimony, evidence or a statement of concern related to the subject of the
proceeding. An appeal from a decision of the appropriate municipal panel, or
from a decision of the municipal legislative body under subsection 4415(d) of
this title, shall be taken in such manner as the Supreme Court may by rule
provide for appeals from State agencies governed by 3 V.S.A. §§ 801–816,
unless the decision is an appropriate municipal panel decision which that the
municipality has elected to be subject to review on the record.
(b) Appeal on the record. If the municipal legislative body has determined
(or been instructed by the voters) to provide that appeals of certain appropriate
municipal panel determinations shall be on the record, has defined what
magnitude or nature of development proposal shall be subject to the production
of an adequate record by the panel, and has provided that the Municipal
Administrative Procedure Act shall apply in these instances, then an appeal
from such a decision of an appropriate municipal panel shall be taken on the
record in accordance with the Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure.
(c) Notice. Notice of the appeal shall be filed by certified mailing, with
fees, to the Environmental Division Board and by mailing a copy to the
municipal clerk or the administrative officer, if so designated, who shall supply
a list of interested persons to the appellant within five working days. Upon
receipt of the list of interested persons, the appellant shall, by certified mail,
provide a copy of the notice of appeal to every interested person, and, if any
VT LEG #386247 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.820
2026 Page 30 of 51
one or more of those persons are not then parties to the appeal, upon motion
they shall be granted leave by the Division Board to intervene.
(d) Local Act 250 review. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a)
of this section, decisions of a development review board under section 4420 of
this title, with respect to local Act 250 review of municipal impacts, are not
subject to appeal, but shall serve as presumptions under the provisions of 10
V.S.A. chapter 151.
(e) Designated areas. Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, a
determination by an appropriate municipal panel that a residential development
will not result in an undue adverse effect on the character of the area affected
shall not be subject to appeal if the a proposed residential development seeking
conditional use approval under subdivision 4414(3) of this title is within a
designated downtown development district, designated growth center, or
designated neighborhood development area. Other elements of the
determination made by the appropriate municipal panel may be appealed.
Sec. 16. 24 V.S.A. § 4472 is amended to read:
§ 4472. EXCLUSIVITY OF REMEDY; FINALITY
(a) Except as provided in subsections (b) and subsection (c) of this section,
the exclusive remedy of an interested person with respect to any decision or act
taken, or any failure to act, under this chapter or with respect to any one or
more of the provisions of any plan or bylaw shall be the appeal to the
VT LEG #386247 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.820
2026 Page 31 of 51
appropriate panel under section 4465 of this title, and the appeal to the
Environmental Division Land Use Review Board from an adverse decision
upon such appeal under section 4471 of this title. The appeal to the
Environmental Division Land Use Review Board, if not on the record, as
allowed under section 4471 of this title, shall be governed by the Vermont
Rules of Civil Procedure and such interested person shall be entitled to a de
novo trial in the Environmental Division Board’s rules. If the appeal to the
Environmental Division is on the record, according to the provisions of section
4471 of this title, it shall be governed by the Vermont Rules of Civil
Procedure. Whether proceeding on the record or de novo, the court shall have
and may exercise all powers and authorities of a Superior Court.
(b) The remedy of an interested person with respect to the constitutionality
of any one or more of the provisions of any bylaw or municipal plan shall be
governed by the Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure with a de novo trial in the
Superior Court, unless the issue arises in the context of another case under this
chapter, in which instance it may be raised in the Environmental Division. In
such cases, hearings before the appropriate municipal panel shall not be
required. This section shall not limit the authority of the Attorney General to
bring an action before the Environmental Division under section 4453 of this
title, with respect to challenges to housing provisions in bylaws. [Repealed.]
VT LEG #386247 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.820
2026 Page 32 of 51
(c) The provisions of this section shall not be construed as preventing
appeals to the Supreme Court in accordance with the Vermont Rules of Civil
Procedure and the Vermont Rules of Appellate Procedure.
(d) Upon the failure of any interested person to appeal to an appropriate
municipal panel under section 4465 of this title, or to appeal to the
Environmental Division Board under section 4471 of this title, all interested
persons affected shall be bound by that decision or act of that officer, the
provisions, or the decisions of the panel, as the case may be, and shall not
thereafter contest, either directly or indirectly, the decision or act, provision, or
decision of the panel in any proceeding, including any proceeding brought to
enforce this chapter.
Sec. 17. 24 V.S.A. § 4453 is amended to read:
§ 4453. CHALLENGES TO HOUSING PROVISIONS IN BYLAWS
The Attorney General or a designee shall investigate when there is a
complaint that a bylaw or its manner of administration violates subdivision
4412(1) of this title, relating to equal treatment of housing and adequate
provision of affordable housing. Upon determining that a violation has
occurred, the Attorney General may file an action in the Environmental Civil
Division to challenge the validity of the bylaw or its manner of administration.
In this action, the municipality shall have the burden of proof to establish by a
preponderance of the evidence that the challenged bylaw or its manner of
VT LEG #386247 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.820
2026 Page 33 of 51
administration does not violate the provisions of subdivision 4412(1) of this
title. If the Division finds the bylaw or its administration to be in violation, it
shall grant the municipality a reasonable period of time to correct the violation
and may extend that time. If the violation continues after that time, the
Division shall order the municipality to grant all requested permits and
certificates of occupancy for housing relating to the area of continuing
violation.
Sec. 18. 24 V.S.A. § 4449 is amended to read:
§ 4449. ZONING PERMIT, CERTIFICATE OF OCCUPANCY, AND
MUNICIPAL LAND USE PERMIT
(a) Within any municipality in which any bylaws have been adopted:
* * *
(3) No permit issued pursuant to this section shall take effect until the
time for appeal in section 4465 of this title has passed, or in the event that a
notice of appeal is properly filed, no such permit shall take effect until
adjudication of that appeal by the appropriate municipal panel is complete and
the time for taking an appeal to the Environmental Division Land Use Review
Board has passed without an appeal being taken. If an appeal is taken to the
Environmental Division Board, the permit shall not take effect until the
Environmental Division Board rules in accordance with 10 V.S.A. § 8504 on
VT LEG #386247 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.820
2026 Page 34 of 51
whether to issue a stay, or until the expiration of 15 days, whichever comes
first.
* * *
Sec. 19. 24 V.S.A. § 4452 is amended to read:
§ 4452. ENFORCEMENT; REMEDIES
If any street, building, structure, or land is or is proposed to be erected,
constructed, reconstructed, altered, converted, maintained, or used in violation
of any bylaw adopted under this chapter, the administrative officer shall
institute in the name of the municipality any appropriate action, injunction, or
other proceeding to prevent, restrain, correct, or abate that construction or use,
or to prevent, in or about those premises, any act, conduct, business, or use
constituting a violation. A court An action under this section may be initiated
in before the Environmental Division Land Use Review Board, or as
appropriate, before the Judicial Bureau, as provided under section 1974a of this
title.
Sec. 20. 24 V.S.A. § 4455 is amended to read:
§ 4455. REVOCATION
On petition by the municipality and after notice and opportunity for hearing,
the Environmental Division Land Use Review Board may revoke a municipal
land use permit issued under this chapter, including a permit for a
telecommunications facility, on a determination that the permittee violated the
VT LEG #386247 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.820
2026 Page 35 of 51
terms of the permit or obtained the permit based on misrepresentation of
material fact.
Sec. 21. 24 V.S.A. § 4469 is amended to read:
§ 4469. APPEAL; VARIANCES
(a) On an appeal under section 4465 or 4471 of this title or on a referral
under subsection 4460(e) of this title in which a variance from the provisions
of a bylaw or interim bylaw is requested for a structure that is not primarily a
renewable energy resource structure, the board of adjustment or the
development review board or the Environmental Division created under 4
V.S.A. chapter 27 Land Use Review Board shall grant variances and render a
decision in favor of the appellant, if all the following facts are found, and the
finding is specified in its decision:
* * *
(b) On an appeal under section 4465 or 4471 of this title in which a
variance from the provisions of a bylaw or interim bylaw is requested for a
structure that is primarily a renewable energy resource structure, the board of
adjustment or development review board or the Environmental Division Land
Use Review Board may grant that variance and render a decision in favor of
the appellant if all the following facts are found, and the finding is specified in
its decision:
* * *
VT LEG #386247 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.820
2026 Page 36 of 51
(c) In rendering a decision in favor of an appellant under this section, a
board of adjustment or development review board or the Environmental
Division Land Use Review Board may attach such conditions to variances as it
may consider necessary and appropriate under the circumstances to implement
the purposes of this chapter and the plan of the municipality then in effect.
* * *
Sec. 22. 24 V.S.A. § 4470 is amended to read:
§ 4470. SUCCESSIVE APPEALS; REQUESTS FOR RECONSIDERATION
TO AN APPROPRIATE MUNICIPAL PANEL
* * *
(b) A municipality shall enforce all decisions of its appropriate municipal
panels, and further, the Superior Court’s Civil or Environmental Division Land
Use Review Board shall enforce such decisions upon petition, complaint, or
appeal or other means in accordance with the laws of this State by such
municipality or any interested person by means of mandamus, injunction,
process of contempt, or otherwise.
Sec. 23. 24 V.S.A. § 2283 is amended to read:
§ 2283. APPEALS
After exhausting the right of administrative appeal to the Board under
19 V.S.A. § 5(d)(5), a person aggrieved by any order, act, or decision of the
Agency of Transportation may appeal to the Superior Court, and all
VT LEG #386247 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.820
2026 Page 37 of 51
proceedings shall be de novo. Any person, including the Agency of
Transportation, may appeal to the Supreme Court from a judgment or ruling of
the Superior Court. Appeals of acts or decisions of the Secretary of Natural
Resources or a legislative body of a municipality under this subchapter shall be
appealed to the Environmental Division Land Use Review Board under
10 V.S.A. § 8503.
* * * Superior Court * * *
Sec. 24. REPEALS
4 V.S.A. § 34 (Jurisdiction; Environmental Division) and 4 V.S.A. § 1001
(Environmental Division) are repealed.
Sec. 25. 4 V.S.A. § 30 is amended to read:
§ 30. SUPERIOR COURT
(a)(1) A Superior Court having statewide jurisdiction is created. The
Superior Court shall have the following divisions:
* * *
(D) An Environmental Division, which shall be a court of record and
have jurisdiction over the matters described in section 34 of this title. The
Vermont Rules for Environmental Proceedings shall apply in the
Environmental Division. [Repealed.]
* * *
VT LEG #386247 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.820
2026 Page 38 of 51
Sec. 26. 4 V.S.A. § 21a is amended to read:
§ 21a. DUTIES OF THE CHIEF SUPERIOR JUDGE
(a) The Chief Superior Judge shall assign and specially assign Superior
judges, including themselves, and Environmental judges to the Superior Court.
All Superior judges except Environmental judges shall be subject to the
requirements of rotation as ordered by the Supreme Court. Assignments made
pursuant to the rotation schedule shall be subject to the approval of the
Supreme Court.
(b) In making any assignment under this section, the Chief Superior Judge
shall give consideration to the experience, temperament, and training of a
judge and the needs of the court. In making an assignment to the
Environmental Division, the Chief Superior Judge shall give consideration to
experience and expertise in environmental and land use law and shall assign or
specially assign judges in a manner to provide appropriate attention to all
geographic areas of the State.
(c) In making any assignments to the Environmental Division under this
section, the Chief Superior Judge shall regularly assign two judges, at least one
of whom shall be an Environmental judge. An Environmental judge may be
assigned to other divisions in the Superior Court for a period of time not
exceeding two years. When assigned to other divisions in the Superior Court,
VT LEG #386247 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.820
2026 Page 39 of 51
the Environmental judge shall have all the powers and responsibilities of a
Superior judge. [Repealed.]
Sec. 27. 4 V.S.A. § 36 is amended to read:
§ 36. COMPOSITION OF THE COURT
(a) Composition of the court. Unless otherwise specified by law, when in
session, a Superior Court shall consist of:
* * *
(5) For cases in the Environmental Division, one Environmental judge
sitting alone. [Repealed.]
* * * Enforcement * * *
Sec. 28. 10 V.S.A. chapter 201 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 201. ADMINISTRATIVE ENVIRONMENTAL LAW
ENFORCEMENT
* * *
§ 8002. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(12) “Environmental Court” or “Environmental Division” means the
Environmental Division of the Superior Court established by 4 V.S.A. § 30.
[Repealed.]
* * *
VT LEG #386247 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.820
2026 Page 40 of 51
§ 8004. ENFORCEMENT OF ACT 250
In addition to the enforcement of chapter 151 of this title on the Secretary’s
initiative, the Secretary shall institute enforcement proceedings under chapter
151 when requested by the Natural Resources Land Use Review Board. The
Secretary and the Land Use Review Board shall develop procedures for the
cooperative enforcement of chapter 151 of this title.
* * *
§ 8007. ASSURANCES OF DISCONTINUANCE
(a) As an alternative to administrative or judicial proceedings, the
Secretary, or the Natural Resources Land Use Review Board, may accept from
a respondent an assurance of discontinuance of a violation. An assurance of
discontinuance shall include:
* * *
(c) An assurance of discontinuance shall be in writing and signed by the
respondent and shall specify the statute or regulation alleged to have been
violated. The assurance of discontinuance shall be simultaneously filed with
the Attorney General and the Environmental Division. The Secretary or the
Land Use Review Board shall post a final draft assurance of discontinuance to
its website and shall provide a final draft assurance of discontinuance to a
person upon request. When signed by the Environmental Division, the
assurance shall become a judicial order. Upon motion by the Attorney General
VT LEG #386247 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.820
2026 Page 41 of 51
made within 14 days after the date the assurance is signed by the Division
Board and upon a finding that the order is insufficient to carry out the purposes
of this chapter, the Division Board shall vacate the order.
* * *
§ 8008. ADMINISTRATIVE ORDERS
* * *
(b) An order shall include:
* * *
(6) a statement that unless the respondent requests a hearing under this
section, the order becomes shall have the effect of a judicial order when filed
with and signed by the Environmental Division Board or Secretary.
* * *
(d)(1) The administrative order and proof of service shall be
simultaneously filed with the Attorney General and the Environmental
Division Board. The Division shall sign the administrative order in the event
that:
(A) the administrative order is properly served on a respondent in
accordance with subsection (a) of this section;
(B) the respondent does not request a hearing in accordance with
subsection (b) of this section; and
(C) the order otherwise meets the requirements of this chapter.
VT LEG #386247 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.820
2026 Page 42 of 51
(2) When signed by the Environmental Division Board, the
administrative order shall become have the effect of a judicial order. Upon
motion by the Attorney General made within 10 days of following the date the
administrative order is signed by the Division Board and upon a finding by the
Division Board that the order is insufficient to carry out the purposes of this
chapter, the Division Board shall vacate the order.
* * *
§ 8009. EMERGENCY ADMINISTRATIVE ORDERS; REQUEST FOR
HEARING
* * *
(b) Prerequisites to issuance. An emergency administrative order may be
issued only if:
(1) the order has been presented to the Environmental Division Board;
(2) all reasonable efforts have been made to notify the respondent of the
presentation of the order to the Environmental Division Board; and
(3) the Environmental Division Board has found that the agency issuing
the order has made a sufficient showing that grounds for issuance of the order
exist.
* * *
(d) Request for hearing. If an emergency order is issued, the respondent
may request a hearing before the Environmental Division Board. Notice of the
VT LEG #386247 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.820
2026 Page 43 of 51
request for hearing shall be filed with the Environmental Division Board and
the agency issuing the order within five business days of following receipt of
the order. A hearing on the emergency order shall be held at the earliest
possible time and shall take precedence over all other hearings. The hearing
shall be held within five business days of following receipt of the notice of the
request for hearing. A request for hearing on an emergency order shall not stay
the order. The Environmental Division Board shall issue a decision within five
business days from the conclusion of the hearing and no later than 30 days
from the date the notice of request for hearing was received.
* * *
§ 8012. REQUEST FOR HEARING
(a) A respondent or the Attorney General may request a hearing on an order
issued by the Secretary. Notice of a request for hearing shall be filed with the
Environmental Division Board and the Secretary. Upon receipt of the notice,
the Secretary shall forward a copy of the order to the Environmental Division
Board.
(b) The Environmental Division Board shall have authority to:
(1) Determine whether a violation has occurred. An order shall be
reversed when it is determined that a violation has not occurred.
(2) Affirm or vacate and remand to the Secretary an order issued under
subdivision 8008(b)(5) of this title. The Environmental Division Board shall
VT LEG #386247 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.820
2026 Page 44 of 51
vacate and remand an order under this subdivision when a violation is found to
exist but the procedure contained in the order is insufficient to carry out the
purposes of this chapter.
(3) Affirm, modify, or reverse any provision of any order issued by the
Secretary except those identified by subdivision (2) of this subsection. In
deciding whether to affirm or reverse a stop work order under this subdivision,
the Environmental Division Board shall consider the economic effect of the
order on individuals other than the respondent.
* * *
(c) Notice of the request for hearing shall be filed within 15 days of
following receipt of the order. The hearing shall be held before the
Environmental Division Board within 30 days of following receipt by the
Division Board of the notice, unless continued for good cause. The
Environmental Division Board shall issue a written decision within 20 days of
following the conclusion of the hearing, and no later than 60 days from the
request for hearing, unless the hearing process is extended for good cause. The
decision shall be sent to the parties by certified mail, return receipt requested,
and shall include:
* * *
§ 8013. CONDUCT OF HEARINGS; APPEAL; STAY
* * *
VT LEG #386247 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.820
2026 Page 45 of 51
(b) Parties may be represented by counsel in hearings before the
Environmental Division Board. The Agency of Natural Resources or the
Board each may represent itself. A party may conduct cross-examination
required for a full and true disclosure of the facts.
(c) An appeal from a decision of the Environmental Division Board may be
taken by the Secretary, the Board, or the respondent to the Supreme Court.
The Attorney General also may appeal if the Attorney General has appeared as
a party.
* * *
§ 8014. ENFORCEMENT OF FINAL ORDERS; COLLECTION ACTIONS
(a) The Secretary may seek enforcement of a final administrative order,
final orders pursuant to an assurance of discontinuance, or civil citations
pursuant to section 8019 of this title, or a landfill extension order in the Civil,
or Criminal, or Environmental Division of the Superior Court.
* * *
§ 8018. REQUESTS FOR HEARINGS ON LANDFILL CLOSURE
EXTENSION ORDERS
(a) The applicant or the Attorney General may request a hearing on the
decision of the Secretary under sections 6605e and 8008a of this title.
Additionally, a municipality in which the landfill is located or an interested
person may request such a hearing if a proposed landfill closure extension
VT LEG #386247 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.820
2026 Page 46 of 51
order would increase the volume of waste disposed on a quarterly basis by 30
percent or more over the volume of waste disposed during the first quarter of
1992. Notice of a request for hearing shall be filed with the Environmental
Division and the Secretary within 15 days of following the date of receipt of
the Secretary’s decision. Upon receipt of the notice, the Secretary shall
forward a copy of the decision to the Environmental Division Board.
(b) The Environmental judge Board shall have authority to determine
whether the Secretary’s decision is in conformance with the provisions of
sections 8008a and 6605e of this title. The Environmental judge Board may
affirm, modify, or reverse the Secretary’s decision and any provision of any
order issued by the Secretary under sections 8008a and 6605e of this title.
(c) The hearing shall be held before the Environmental Division Board
within 30 days of following receipt by the Division Board of the notice, unless
continued for good cause. The Environmental Division Board shall issue a
written decision within 20 days of following the conclusion of the hearing, and
no later than 60 days from the request for hearing, unless the hearing process is
extended for good cause. The decision shall be sent to the parties by certified
mail, return receipt requested, and shall include:
* * *
(e) The Environmental Division Board may grant party status to an
interested person in a hearing under this section.
VT LEG #386247 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.820
2026 Page 47 of 51
* * *
§ 8019. CIVIL CITATIONS
(a) The Secretary and the Board each shall have the authority to adopt rules
for the issuance of civil citations for violations of their respective enabling
statutes or rules adopted under those statutes that are enforceable in the
Environmental Division. Any proposed rule under this section shall include
the full, minimum, and waiver penalty amounts for each violation. The
maximum civil penalty for any violation brought under this section shall not
exceed $3,000.00 exclusive of court fees.
* * *
(c) The Secretary or Board Chair and his or her the Secretary’s or Board
Chair’s duly authorized representative shall have the authority to amend or
dismiss a citation by so marking the citation and returning it to the
Environmental Division or by notifying the hearing officer or judge at the
hearing.
* * *
§ 8020. PUBLIC PARTICIPATION IN ENFORCEMENT
* * *
(b) Draft and final action. Prior to issuing an administrative order,
assurance of discontinuance, or civil citation under this chapter and sending it
to the Environmental Division, the Secretary or the Board shall post a draft
VT LEG #386247 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.820
2026 Page 48 of 51
copy of the administrative order, assurance of discontinuance, or civil citation
for public notice and written comment for 30 days. At the conclusion of the
30-day notice and written comment period, the Secretary or the Board shall
evaluate the proposed action pursuant to the written comments received. After
the evaluation of the written comments, the Secretary or the Board may
withdraw an administrative order, assurance of discontinuance, or civil
citation. At the conclusion of the 30-day notice period, if no comments have
been received, the Secretary or the Board shall file the draft as a final
administrative order, assurance of discontinuance, or civil citation with the
Environmental Division, and the Environmental Division may review and
approve as an order of the court the administrative order, assurance of
discontinuance, or civil citation as set out elsewhere in this chapter. When the
Secretary or Board issues a final administrative order, assurance of
discontinuance, or civil citation, it shall be sent to the Environmental Division
along with any written comments received during the 30-day comment period.
Concurrent with filing with the Environmental Division, the The Secretary or
Board shall post the final proposed action for public notice for 14 days.
(c) Filing with court. If a comment was received on the draft document,
the Environmental Division shall hold the administrative order, assurance of
discontinuance, or civil citation for 14 days from the date of filing to allow any
person who has filed written comments under subsection (b), who is not
VT LEG #386247 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.820
2026 Page 49 of 51
satisfied with the final action of the Agency or the Board, and who meets the
definition of “aggrieved person” under subsection (a) of this section to file a
motion for permissive intervention pursuant to the procedure in Rule 24(c) of
the Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure. [Repealed.]
(d) Court Board action without motion to intervene. If no comment was
filed on the draft document or if, at the conclusion of the 14-day period, no
motion to intervene has been filed, the Environmental Division Board in its
discretion, with or without a hearing, shall issue an order to affirm, vacate, or
remand the administrative order, assurance of discontinuance, or civil citation.
* * *
(f) Court action upon motion to intervene. A motion for permissive
intervention shall clearly state the basis for the claim that the administrative
order, assurance of discontinuance, or civil citation is insufficient to carry out
the purposes of this chapter. A hearing may be held on the motion for
permissive intervention in the discretion of the Environmental Division Board.
When the Environmental Division Board determines that a motion to intervene
fails to meet the requirements for permissive intervention, the court shall deny
the motion.
(g) Emergency administrative order. When the Secretary issues an
emergency administrative order, the prefiling public notice and comment
provisions contained in this section shall not apply. The Environmental
VT LEG #386247 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.820
2026 Page 50 of 51
Division Board, without comment or hearing, shall act on the emergency
administrative order as required by section 8009 of this title and may issue its
own order. The Secretary shall publish the emergency administrative order
concurrent with filing it with the Environmental Division Board. A person
shall have 14 days from the date the emergency administrative order is filed to
file a motion for permissive intervention. A motion to intervene shall not stay
an emergency administrative order.
(h) Standard of review on motion to intervene. The Environmental
Division Board shall evaluate a motion from an aggrieved person for
permissive intervention in light of Rule 24(b)(1) of the Vermont Rules of Civil
Procedure. When the Environmental Division Board permits an aggrieved
person to intervene, it shall be for the sole purpose of establishing that the
terms of an administrative order, emergency administrative order, assurance of
discontinuance, or civil citation are insufficient to carry out the purposes of this
chapter. The intervenor shall have the burden of proof by a preponderance of
the evidence that the administrative order, emergency administrative order,
assurance of discontinuance, or civil citation is insufficient to carry out the
purposes of this chapter. A hearing may be held on the claim that the
administrative order, emergency administrative order, assurance of
discontinuance, or civil citation is insufficient to carry out the purposes of this
chapter in the discretion of the Environmental Division Board. The
VT LEG #386247 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.820
2026 Page 51 of 51
Environmental Division Board, upon finding that the proposed action is
insufficient to carry out the purposes of this chapter, shall inform the parties in
writing and shall include the basis of its decision and shall vacate the proposed
action.
(i) Authority of Secretary or Board to object. The Secretary or Board shall
not oppose any motion filed for permissive intervention. When the
Environmental Division Board permits a person to intervene, the Secretary, the
Board, or the respondent may oppose the intervenor’s claim that the proposed
action is insufficient to carry out the purposes of this chapter.
* * *
Sec. 29. APPROPRIATION
In fiscal year 2027, $50,000.00 is appropriated from the General Fund to the
Land Use Review Board to fund training for appropriate municipal panels on
appeals procedures.
* * * Effective Date * * *
Sec. 30. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386247 v.3